Maryland, session 2026, SB0591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 9. MARYLAND CHAPTER OF THE NATIONAL PUBLIC SAFETY ALLIANCE
FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0591*

SENATE BILL 591
2–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CHAPTER” MEANS THE MARYLAND CHAPTER OF THE NATIONAL
PUBLIC SAFETY ALLIANCE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(C) “DISABILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–101 OF THE HUMAN
SERVICES ARTICLE.
2–902.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND CHAPTER OF THE NATIONAL PUBLIC SAFETY
ALLIANCE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE CHAPTER IS TO:
(1) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A SECURE INTERFACE FOR MEMBERS
OF THE PUBLIC TO VOLUNTARILY SUBMIT CRITICAL PERSONAL INFORMATION,
INCLUDING CONTACT DETAILS, PHYSICAL DESCRIPTIONS, PHOTOGRAPHS, DRIVER’S
LICENSES, VEHICLE INFORMATION, AND ANY DISABILITY–RELATED NEEDS,
ACCESSIBLE TO AND FOR USE BY LAW ENFORCEMENT DURING AN EMERGENCY
RESPONSE OR INTERACTION WITH THE PUBLIC;
(2) ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS FOR THE
SUBMISSION OF AND ACCESS TO INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE SECURE
INTERFACE;
(3) ENABLE CROSS–JURISDICTIONAL ACCESS TO CHAPTER
INFORMATION BY PARTICIPATING LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES REGARDLESS OF
AN INDIVIDUAL’S PLACE OF RESIDENCE; AND
(4) ENSURE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS ARE ABLE TO RESPOND
EFFECTIVELY TO INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES AND REDUCE THE LIKELIHOOD
OF NEGATIVE OUTCOMES.
2–903.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
DISABILITIES, SHALL:

SENATE BILL 591 3
(1) DEVELOP AND DISSEMINATE GUIDELINES AND TRAINING,
INCLUDING MANDATORY USE BY ALL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, BASED ON
PROTOCOLS AND POLICIES IDENTIFIED BY THE PUBLIC SAFETY ALLIANCE FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES COMMISSION, AS ENACTED BY CHAPTER ___
(6LR1412) OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2026;
(2) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES TO AID IN THE IMPLEMENTATION OF CHAPTER PROTOCOLS AND
POLICIES; AND
(3) MONITOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROTOCOLS, POLICIES, AND
GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
MAY PENALIZE A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE BY:
(1) ESTABLISHING INELIGIBILITY FOR STATE FUNDING FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT TRAINING PROGRAMS; AND
(2) PROVIDING FOR REVIEW BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL FOR POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS OF APPLICABLE STATE LAW.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS
COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) PROTOCOLS AND POLICIES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY COMPLIANCE WITH DEPARTMENT
PROTOCOLS AND POLICIES.
2–904.
(A) THE CHAPTER SHALL ESTABLISH A GRANT PROGRAM TO ASSIST LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES WITH THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TRAINING AND THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF PROTOCOLS AND POLICIES.
(B) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION SUFFICIENT
TO SUPPORT THE GRANT PROGRAM AND THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 591
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “Commission” means the Public Safety Alliance for Individuals
with Disabilities Commission.
(b) There is a Public Safety Alliance for Individuals with Disabilities Commission.
(c) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) one sworn member of the Maryland State Police, appointed by the
Secretary of State Police;
(5) one sworn member of the Maryland Transit Administration Police,
appointed by the Chief of the Maryland Transit Administration Police;
(6) one sworn member of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of
General Services, appointed by the Chief of the Maryland Capitol Police;
(7) one representative of Disability Rights Maryland;
(8) one representative of the ARC Maryland;
(9) one representative of an organization in the State that advocates for
individuals with a physical disability, appointed by the Secretary of Disabilities; and
(10) at least one member of the public with expertise in disability rights and
public safety, appointed by the Secretary of State Police.
(d) The Secretary of State Police shall designate the chair of the Commission.
(e) The State agencies represented on the Commission shall provide staff for the
Commission.
(f) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.

SENATE BILL 591 5
(g) The Commission shall:
(1) meet:
(i) on a monthly basis during the implementation by the Maryland
Chapter of the National Public Safety Alliance for Individuals with Disabilities of the
secure interface; and
(ii) once every other month thereafter to assess and address any
issues with the secure interface, assess engagement with the public and develop strategies
for greater engagement, if necessary, and assess other issues as needed;
(2) study and make recommendations for:
(i) the establishment of a secure interface for the use of law
enforcement agencies in the State;
(ii) the implementation of statewide protocols and policies regarding
the use of the secure interface by law enforcement agencies; and
(iii) a statewide training plan;
(3) coordinate with the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy to
conduct public outreach and engagement campaigns to inform communities about the
resources of the Maryland Chapter of the National Public Safety Alliance for Individuals
with Disabilities established under Section 1 of this Act; and
(4) on or before February 1, 2027, submit to the Secretary of State Police
the statewide protocols and policies and training plan developed in accordance with this
subsection for approval by the Secretary of State Police.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at
the end of September 30, 2029, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.